Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.120

Limitation on use of borrowed money.

Moneys received from borrowing shall be used for no other purpose than that for which borrowed except that if any surplus shall remain after the accomplishment of the purpose for which borrowed, it shall be used to redeem the county debt. Where the budget contains an expenditure program to be financed from a bond issue to be authorized thereafter no such expenditure shall be made or incurred until such bonds have been duly authorized.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.40.120. Prior: 1945 c 201 s 1, part; 1943 c 66 s 1, part; 1927 c 301 s 1, part; 1923 c 164 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3997-5, part.]